North Carolina, session 2025, HB389.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. EDUCATION

FUNDS FOR UNCC DATA SCIENCE AND BATTERY ENGINEERING AND
RECYCLING
SECTION 1.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of two million one hundred thousand
dollars ($2,100,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be
allocated to the University of North Carolina at Charlotte to expand its data science programs
and battery engineering and recycling initiatives.

PART II. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

TRANSITIONS TO COMMUNITY LIVING INITIATIVE FUNDING
SECTION 2.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support, the sum of twelve
million one hundred ninety-two thousand one hundred twenty-four dollars ($12,192,124) in
recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide increased funding for
implementation of the Transitions to Community Living Initiative Plan designed to achieve
compliance with the 2012 U.S. Department of Justice Settlement. Funds appropriated by this
section shall be allocated and used as follows:
(1) The sum of eighty-four thousand one hundred twenty-four dollars ($84,124)
in recurring funds shall be used to support one full-time Olmstead Associate
Director position within the Division of Central Management and Support.
(2) The sum of twelve million one hundred eight thousand dollars ($12,108,000)
in recurring funds shall be used to provide community-based supported
housing, tenancy support, supported employment, and wrap-around
community-based mental health services to eligible adults with serious mental
illnesses as they transition from institutional to community care settings, and
to provide project management support for the Transitions to Community
Living Initiative.
*H389-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS FUNDING
SECTION 2.2.(a) The State Controller shall transfer from funds available in the
Information Technology Reserve established in Section 2.2(h) of S.L. 2021-180 to the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support
Special Fund (Budget Code 24410, Budget Fund 230034), the sum of fifteen million one hundred
eighteen thousand one hundred seventy-seven dollars ($15,118,177) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year. The funds transferred pursuant to this section are appropriated for the
fiscal year in which they are transferred to be allocated and used to fund continued
implementation of electronic health records (EHR) at State-operated healthcare facilities.
SECTION 2.2.(b) In addition, the State Controller shall transfer from funds available
in the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support
Special Fund (Budget Code 24410, Budget Fund 230008), the sum of three million four hundred
ninety thousand one hundred forty-eight dollars ($3,490,148) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to the Department of Health and Human Services Special Fund referenced
in subsection (a) of this section (Budget Code 24410, Budget Fund 230034). The funds
transferred pursuant to this section are appropriated for the fiscal year in which they are
transferred to be allocated and used for the same purpose specified in subsection (a) of this
section.
SECTION 2.2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, the sum of three million nineteen thousand two hundred thirty-three
dollars ($3,019,233) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used
to fund ongoing operations and maintenance of EHR at State-operated healthcare facilities.

FUNDING FOR MEDICAID HEALTHY OPPORTUNITIES PILOT
SECTION 2.3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of thirty million dollars
($30,000,000) in nonrecurring funds and associated receipts for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be
used for the continued operations of the Healthy Opportunities Pilots program in current pilot
counties.

RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM APPLICATION AND FUNDS
SECTION 2.4.(a) The lead State agency designated by the Governor to develop and
submit the application for funding under the Rural Health Transformation Program (RHTP)
established by the One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Section 71401 of P.L. 119-21) shall collaborate
with all relevant state entities to ensure that the RHTP application submitted on behalf of North
Carolina includes demonstrated expertise on any combination of rural healthcare access, rural
healthcare quality, rural healthcare workforce, or rural healthcare outcomes through system
transformation. The lead State agency described in this subsection shall provide to the Chairs of
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services a copy of the RHTP
application it submits on behalf of North Carolina to the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services on the date of submission. In addition, by November 15, 2025, the lead State
agency described in this subsection shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services summarizing the rural health transformation vision,
plan, goals, strategies, proposed projects, and sustainability plans for North Carolina as described
in the State's Rural Health Transformation Program application.
SECTION 2.4.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-4(9) and consistent with Section
7(1) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution, federal funds received by the State under
the RHTP shall be available for expenditure only upon an act of appropriation by the General
Assembly.
Page 2 House Bill 389-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.4.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART III. AGRICULTURE AND NATURAL AND ECONOMIC RESOURCES

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES – OPERATING
RESERVES
SECTION 3.1.(a) Recurring Funding. – There is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources (Department) the sum of ten million
seventy-eight thousand one hundred forty-nine dollars ($10,078,149) in recurring funds
beginning with the 2025-2026 fiscal year and ten million eight hundred sixty-four thousand nine
hundred fifty dollars ($10,864,950) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, to be
allocated as follows:
(1) Four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) in each year of the fiscal
biennium to Budget Fund 105111 for up to three full-time equivalent (FTE)
positions and operating costs for the expanded visitor center and grounds at
the Fort Fisher State Historic Site.
(2) Three hundred eighty-five thousand eight hundred fifteen dollars ($385,815)
in each year of the fiscal biennium to Budget Fund 105111 for up to three FTE
positions and operating costs for the newly renovated powerhouse and car
repair shed at the North Carolina Transportation Museum.
(3) Nine hundred fifty-three thousand six hundred thirty dollars ($953,630) and
up to 12 FTE positions in the 2025-2026 fiscal year and one million seven
hundred forty thousand four hundred thirty-one dollars ($1,740,431) and up
to 24 FTE positions in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to Budget Fund 105141 for
personnel and operating costs associated with the renovation and expansion
of the Fort Fisher Aquarium.
(4) Five million six hundred forty-one thousand four hundred forty-six dollars
($5,641,446) in each year of the fiscal biennium to Budget Fund 105140 for
up to 54 FTE positions and operating costs associated with the new Asia
complex at the North Carolina Zoo.
(5) Two million six hundred forty-seven thousand two hundred fifty-eight dollars
($2,647,258) in each year of the fiscal biennium to Budget Fund 105137 for
up to 20 FTE positions. The Department may allocate the positions funded by
this subdivision among Bakers Lake, Bob's Creek, and Salmon Creek State
Natural Areas, Pettigrew and Lake Waccamaw State Parks, and Wilderness
Gateway State Trail.
SECTION 3.1.(b) Nonrecurring Funding. – There is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department the sum of six million nine hundred thirty-six thousand nine hundred
dollars ($6,936,900) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and four million five
hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, to be
allocated as follows:
(1) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
Budget Fund 105111 for nonrecurring position, operating, and equipment
costs associated with the expansion at the Fort Fisher State Historic Site.
(2) Four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) in each year of the
fiscal biennium to Budget Fund 105141 to replace receipts while the Fort
Fisher Aquarium is closed for renovations.
(3) One million fifty-six thousand six hundred dollars ($1,056,600) in the
2025-2026 fiscal year to Budget Fund 105140 for nonrecurring position,
operating, and equipment costs associated with the new Asia complex at the
North Carolina Zoo.
House Bill 389-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) One million two hundred eighty thousand three hundred dollars ($1,280,300)
in the 2025-2026 fiscal year to Budget Fund 105137 for nonrecurring position,
operating, and equipment costs associated with the expansion of State parks
through Connect NC bonds or other capital appropriations.

AUTHORIZE THE ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT COMMISSION TO
EMPLOY INDEPENDENT STAFF
SECTION 3.2.(a) G.S. 143B-283 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-283. Environmental Management Commission – members; selection; removal;
compensation; quorum; services.
…
(b4) Administrative Support. – All clerical and other services required by the Commission
shall be supplied by the Secretary of Environmental Quality.Commission Staff, Structure, and
Function. –
(1) The chair is authorized and empowered to employ professional,
administrative, technical, and clerical personnel as the chair may determine to
be necessary in the proper discharge of the Commission's duty and
responsibility as provided by law. The chair shall organize and direct the work
of the Commission staff. Any additional clerical and other services required
by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary of the Department at
the direction of the chair.
(2) The salaries and compensation of all such personnel shall be fixed in the
manner provided by law for fixing and regulating salaries and compensation
by other State agencies.
(3) The chair, within allowed budgetary limits and as allowed by law, shall
authorize and approve travel, subsistence, and related expenses of such
personnel incurred while traveling on official business.
…."
SECTION 3.2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Environmental Quality the sum of seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) in recurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for up to five full-time equivalent positions
as dedicated staff for the Environmental Management Commission. The positions may be
established from within the following classifications, at salary grades up to Level III: Deputy
Secretary, General Counsel (Attorney), Engineer, Environmental Program Consultant,
Economist, and Administrative Officer.

WATER SEWER ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.3.(a) Award Authorized. – Pursuant to Part 2H of Article 10 of Chapter
143B of the General Statutes, the Department of Commerce may commit in a Governor's Letter
to reimburse, over a period of time not less than 10 years, a business, as defined in
G.S. 143B-437.51, for the costs incurred for an eligible project. For purposes of this section, an
eligible project is the construction of, or improvements to, new or existing water or sewer lines,
facilities, or equipment for new, proposed, or existing buildings by the business, and can include
water reuse and water reclamation projects, if the business commits, in a company performance
agreement, to the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 3.3.(b) Award Amount. – The total amount that may be committed for
reimbursement under this section is equal to the lesser of (i) fifty million dollars ($50,000,000)
or (ii) fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the eligible project. The maximum amount that can be
paid out in a single calendar year for all but the final year of the award term is the lesser of
one-tenth of the amount committed or one-half of the costs incurred and verified by the business
for that calendar year.
Page 4 House Bill 389-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.3.(c) Company Performance Agreement. – For a project to be eligible
under this section, a business operating a manufacturing site within the same county and river
basin as the eligible project must commit to the following requirements in addition to those
contained in G.S. 143B-437.72(b):
(1) Invest at least two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) of private funds in the
development or expansion of the manufacturing site served by or located
within the same county as the eligible project.
(2) For the greater of the term of the agreement or 10 years, create at least 500
new jobs having an overall average compensation that exceeds the average
wage for all insured private employers in the county in which the eligible
project is located and maintain both the new and existing jobs of the business
in that county.
(3) Annually verify costs incurred for the eligible project.
(4) Ensure that the eligible project will supply at least sixty percent (60%) of the
total aggregate water and wastewater needs required by the manufacturing site
as developed or expanded by the investment made under subdivision (1) of
this subsection.
(5) Not seek or accept any other grant from the State, including a grant pursuant
to Part 2G of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, for any jobs
created as part of the company performance agreement.
SECTION 3.3.(d) One NC Commitment Exclusion. – The amount committed
pursuant to this section shall not be included in calculating the amount authorized to be
committed pursuant to G.S. 143B-437.71(b1).
SECTION 3.3.(e) Agreement Binding. – A Governor's Letter issued pursuant to this
section is a binding obligation of the State and is not subject to State funds being appropriated
by the General Assembly.
SECTION 3.3.(f) Match Requirement. – Notwithstanding G.S. 143B-437.72(c)(1),
a local government is not required to match the funds allocated by the State for an eligible project
under this section.
SECTION 3.3.(g) Effective Date. – This section is effective when this act becomes
law.

SUBSISTENCE ALLOWANCE FOR MEMBERS OF THE UTILITIES COMMISSION
SECTION 3.4.(a) G.S. 62-10(h1) reads as rewritten:
"(h1) In addition to compensation for their services, each member of the Commission who
lives at least 50 miles from the City of Raleigh shall be paid a the following allowances:
(1) A weekly travel allowance for each week the member travels to the City of
Raleigh from the member's home for business of the Commission. The
allowance shall be calculated for each member by multiplying the actual
round-trip mileage from that member's home to the City of Raleigh by the
rate-per-mile which is the business standard mileage rate set by the Internal
Revenue Service in Rev. Proc. 93-51, December 27, 1993.
(2) A daily subsistence allowance for meals and lodging at a rate of one hundred
forty-three dollars and ten cents ($143.10) for each day of service when the
member travels to the City of Raleigh from the member's home for business
of the Commission."
SECTION 3.4.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

EDPNC MARKETING FUNDING
SECTION 3.5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce (Department) for the nonprofit corporation with which the Department contracts
House Bill 389-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
pursuant to G.S. 143B-431.01(b) (Nonprofit) the nonrecurring sums of twenty million dollars
($20,000,000) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The Nonprofit shall equally
allocate the use of funds it receives under this section each fiscal year for (i) business marketing
expenses and (ii) travel and tourism marketing expenses.

PART IV. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY

FUNDING FOR VIPER NETWORK OPERATING SHORTFALL
SECTION 4.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Highway
Patrol, Budget Fund 102690, the sum of two million one hundred thousand dollars ($2,100,000)
in recurring funds beginning in the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to maintain and operate the
VIPER network.

SCHOOL SAFETY GRANTS
SECTION 4.2.(a) Definitions. – For the purposes of this section, the following
definitions shall apply:
(1) Community partner. – A public or private entity, including, but not limited to,
a nonprofit corporation or a local management entity/managed care
organization (LME/MCO), that partners with a public school unit to provide
services or pay for the provision of services for the unit.
(2) School health support personnel. – School psychologists, school counselors,
school nurses, and school social workers.
SECTION 4.2.(b) Program; Purpose. – The Executive Director of the Center for
Safer Schools shall establish the School Safety Grants Program (Program) for the 2025-2026
fiscal year. The purpose of the Program shall be to improve safety in public school units by
providing grants in the 2025-2026 fiscal year for (i) services for students in crisis, (ii) school
safety training, (iii) safety equipment in schools, and (iv) subsidizing the School Resource Officer
Grants Program.
SECTION 4.2.(c) Grant Applications. – A public school unit may submit an
application to the Executive Director of the Center for Safer Schools for one or more grants
pursuant to this section in the 2025-2026 fiscal year. The application shall include an assessment,
to be performed in conjunction with a local law enforcement agency, of the need for improving
school safety within the public school unit that would receive the funding or services. The
application shall identify current and ongoing needs and estimated costs associated with those
needs.
SECTION 4.2.(d) Criteria and Guidelines. – The Executive Director of the Center
for Safer Schools shall develop criteria and guidelines for the administration and use of the grants
pursuant to this section, including any documentation required to be submitted by applicants. In
assessing grant applications, the Executive Director shall consider at least all of the following
factors:
(1) The level of resources available to the public school unit that would receive
the funding.
(2) Whether the public school unit has received other grants for school safety.
(3) The overall impact on student safety in the public school unit if the identified
needs are funded.
SECTION 4.2.(e) Grants for Students in Crisis. – Of the funds appropriated by this
section for the grants provided in this section, the Executive Director of the Center for Safer
Schools, in consultation with the Department of Health and Human Services, shall award grants
to public school units to contract with community partners to provide or pay for the provision of
any of the following crisis services:
Page 6 House Bill 389-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Crisis respite services for parents or guardians of an individual student to
prevent more intensive or costly levels of care.
(2) Training and expanded services for therapeutic foster care families and
licensed child placement agencies that provide services to students who (i)
need support to manage their health, welfare, and safety and (ii) have any of
the following:
a. Cognitive or behavioral problems.
b. Developmental delays.
c. Aggressive behavior.
(3) Evidence-based therapy services aligned with targeted training for students
and their parents or guardians, including any of the following:
a. Parent-child interaction therapy.
b. Trauma-focused cognitive behavioral therapy.
c. Dialectical behavior therapy.
d. Child-parent psychotherapy.
(4) Any other crisis service, including peer-to-peer mentoring, that is likely to
increase school safety. Of the funds appropriated by this act for the grants
provided in this section, the Executive Director shall use no more than three
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the
services identified in this subdivision.
SECTION 4.2.(f) Grants for Training to Increase School Safety. – Of the funds
appropriated by this section for the grants provided in this section, the Executive Director of the
Center for Safer Schools, in consultation with the Department of Health and Human Services,
shall award grants to public school units to contract with community partners to address school
safety by providing training to help students develop healthy responses to trauma and stress. The
training shall be targeted and evidence-based and shall include any of the following services:
(1) Counseling on Access to Lethal Means (CALM) training for school health
support personnel, local first responders, and teachers on the topics of suicide
prevention and reducing access by students to lethal means.
(2) Training for school health support personnel on comprehensive and
evidence-based clinical treatments for students and their parents or guardians,
including any of the following:
a. Parent-child interaction therapy.
b. Trauma-focused cognitive behavioral therapy.
c. Behavioral therapy.
d. Dialectical behavior therapy.
e. Child-parent psychotherapy.
(3) Training for students and school employees on community resilience models
to improve understanding and responses to trauma and significant stress.
(4) Training for school health support personnel on Modular Approach to
Therapy for Children with Anxiety, Depression, Trauma, or Conduct
problems (MATCH-ADTC), including any of the following components:
a. Trauma-focused cognitive behavioral therapy.
b. Parent and student coping skills.
c. Problem solving.
d. Safety planning.
(5) Any other training, including the training on the facilitation of peer-to-peer
mentoring, that is likely to increase school safety. Of the funds appropriated
by this section for the grants provided in this section, the Executive Director
shall use no more than three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in the
2025-2026 fiscal year for the services identified in this subdivision.
House Bill 389-Third Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.2.(g) Grants for Safety Equipment. – Of the funds appropriated by this
section for the grants provided in this section, the Executive Director of the Center for Safer
Schools shall award grants to public school units for (i) the purchase of safety equipment for
school buildings and (ii) training associated with the use of safety equipment purchased pursuant
to this subsection. Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-218.105(b), charter schools may receive grants
for school safety equipment pursuant to this subsection.
SECTION 4.2.(h) Subsidizing School Resource Officer Grants Program. – If the
Executive Director of the Center for Safer Schools receives applications for grants for school
resource officers under G.S. 143B-1208.20 in excess of the amount of funding appropriated for
school resource officer grants in the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the Executive Director may use the
funds appropriated for the grants provided for in this section to cover the unmet need for school
resource officer grants.
SECTION 4.2.(i) Supplement Not Supplant. – Grants provided to public school units
pursuant to the Program shall be used to supplement and not to supplant State or non-State funds
already provided for these services.
SECTION 4.2.(j) Administrative Costs. – Of the funds appropriated to the Center
for Safer Schools by this section for the grants provided in this section, the Executive Director
of the Center for Safer Schools may retain a total of up to one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year for administrative costs associated with the Program.
SECTION 4.2.(k) Disbursement. – The Executive Director of the Center for Safer
Schools may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Department of Public
Instruction to disburse grants awarded under this section.
SECTION 4.2.(l) Program Report. – No later than April 1, 2026, the Executive
Director of the Center for Safer Schools shall report on the Program to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and
Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the
Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Senate Appropriations/Base
Budget Committee, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Fiscal Research Division.
The report shall include at least the following information:
(1) The identity of each public school unit and community partner that received
grant funds through the Program.
(2) The amount of funding received by each entity identified pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The services, training, and equipment purchased with grant funds by each
entity that received a grant.
(4) Recommendations for the implementation of additional effective school
safety measures.
SECTION 4.2.(m) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Center for Safer Schools the sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for the Program established in this section.

CREATION OF THE MENTAL HEALTH FOR DETAINEES GRANT PROGRAM AT
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
SECTION 4.3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services (DMH/DD/SUS), the sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to distribute grants pursuant to the
Mental Health for Detainees Grant Program (MHD Grant Program) created by this section.
SECTION 4.3.(b) The DMH/DD/SUS shall develop and implement the MHD Grant
Program pursuant to the minimum requirements set forth in this section.
SECTION 4.3.(c) The following criteria shall apply to the MHD Grant Program:
Page 8 House Bill 389-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Grant applicants shall be the administrator or other person in charge of a local
confinement facility with the legal authority to hold a defendant pursuant to
G.S. 15A-533.
(2) Grant funds shall be used by grant recipients for the provision of and, if
necessary, transportation to a commitment examiner for a mental health
evaluation.
(3) The DMH/DD/SUS shall set the maximum amount of each grant based upon
the availability of funds, provided that no grantee shall receive more than two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in grant funds.
(4) The DMH/DD/SUS shall prioritize awarding grants to grantees in
development tier one and tier two counties, as defined by G.S. 143B-437.08.
(5) Prior to awarding or rejecting a grant application, the DMH/DD/SUS shall
consult with the North Carolina Sheriffs' Association regarding the grant
application.
SECTION 4.3.(d) No later than October 1 of each year following a fiscal year in
which a grantee received funds pursuant to the MHD Grant Program created by this section, each
grantee shall submit a report to the DMH/DD/SUS delineating the uses of the funds.
SECTION 4.3.(e) No later than December 1 of a year in which the DMH/DD/SUS
receives a report required by subsection (d) of this section, the DMH/DD/SUS shall submit a
report compiling all reports received under subsection (d) of this section to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services.
SECTION 4.3.(f) The DMH/DD/SUS may use up to two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000) of the funds appropriated by this section for administrative purposes.
SECTION 4.3.(g) The funds appropriated by this section shall not revert on June 30,
2026, but shall remain available to the DMH/DD/SUS until June 30, 2027.

PART V. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

EMERGENCY TRAINING CENTER OPERATING COSTS
SECTION 5.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the
State Fire Marshal in the Department of Insurance the sum of two million three hundred thousand
dollars ($2,300,000) in recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to
be used to support the operating costs of the Emergency Training Center located in Stanly
County.

STATE PROPERTY FIRE INSURANCE FUND
SECTION 5.2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the
State Fire Marshal in the Department of Insurance the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the purpose of covering increased
expenditures related to the State's reinsurance policy.

BUDGET AND HUMAN RESOURCES POSITIONS
SECTION 5.3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the
State Fire Marshal in the Department of Insurance the sum of three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000) in recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide
funds for three administrative positions, including salaries and benefits, to support the Office of
the State Fire Marshal's budgetary and human resources needs.

DIRECT OSBM TO GIVE OSFM SEPARATE BUDGET CODE
House Bill 389-Third Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5.4. The Office of State Budget and Management shall establish a new
budget code for the Office of the State Fire Marshal (OSFM) and create new budget funds for
each division of the OSFM.

RENOVATE FAYETTEVILLE STATE VETERANS HOME
SECTION 5.5.(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there is appropriated
from the cash balance of the North Carolina Veterans Home Trust Fund, Budget Code 63050, to
the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, the sum of twenty-seven million dollars
($27,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to renovate and repair the
Fayetteville State Veterans Home.
SECTION 5.5.(b) Section 40.5(c) of S.L. 2021-180 is repealed.

PART VI. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY

IBIS SYSTEM REPLACEMENT AND STABILIZATION
SECTION 6.1. There is appropriated from the IT Reserve to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twenty million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars
($20,850,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and eight hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($850,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for
the replacement and stabilization of the IBIS system.

PART VII. TRANSPORTATION

MARINE VESSEL MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS
SECTION 7.1.(a) There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department
of Transportation the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to provide funds for marine vessel maintenance and repairs at external
shipyards to meet U.S. Coast Guard dry dock requirements.
SECTION 7.1.(b) No later than January 1, 2026, and quarterly thereafter until the
funds are expended, the Ferry Division of the Department of Transportation shall submit a
progress report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal
Research Division on the use of funds appropriated by this section for marine vessel dry docking.
The report shall include the following information:
(1) A list of all marine vessels scheduled or under contract for dry docking.
(2) The estimated cost of the work to be completed for each marine vessel sent to
a private shipyard for dry dock.
(3) The actual cost of the work and the total funds used as of the report date.

PART VIII. FINANCE

INSURANCE HOLDING COMPANY EXEMPTION
SECTION 8.1.(a) G.S. 105-122(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Determination of Net Worth. – A corporation taxed under this section shall determine
the total amount of its net worth on the basis of the books and records of the corporation as of
the close of its income year. The net worth of a corporation is its total assets without regard to
the deduction for accumulated depreciation, depletion, or amortization less its total liabilities,
computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as of the end of the
corporation's taxable year. If the corporation does not maintain its books and records in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, then its net worth is computed in
accordance with the accounting method used by the entity for federal tax purposes. A
corporation's net worth is subject to the following adjustments:
Page 10 House Bill 389-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(9) A deduction for any investment, whether direct or indirect, in an insurance
company subject to tax under Article 8B of this Chapter and any investment,
whether direct or indirect, in an insurance company that would be subject to
such tax if it engaged in business in this State. The deduction afforded under
this subdivision only applies if the corporation owns, directly or indirectly,
more than eighty percent (80%) of the outstanding voting stock, voting capital
interests, or ownership interests in the insurance company."
SECTION 8.1.(b) This section is effective retroactively for taxable years beginning
on or after January 1, 2019, and applicable to the calculation of franchise tax reported on the
2018 and later corporate income tax returns.

PART IX. MISCELLANEOUS AND EFFECTIVE DATE

ADDITIONAL TRANSPARENCY IN STATE BUDGETING
SECTION 9.1.(a) Article 5 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143C-5-6. List requesting member of the General Assembly in the Current Operations
Appropriations Act.
Each provision of the Current Operations Appropriations Act enacted by the General
Assembly, and each provision of an appropriations bill making adjustments to that act, shall
specify which member or members of the General Assembly requested inclusion of the provision
in that act. This section shall be considered and treated as a rule of procedure in the Senate and
House of Representatives unless provided otherwise by a rule of either branch of the General
Assembly."
SECTION 9.1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
Current Operations Appropriations Acts enacted on or after that date.

EFFECT OF HEADINGS
SECTION 9.2. The headings to the Parts and sections of this act are a convenience
to the reader and are for reference only. The headings do not expand, limit, or define the text of
this act.

CONSTRUCTION
SECTION 9.3. Except where expressly repealed or amended by this act, any
legislation enacted during the 2025 Regular Session expressly appropriating funds to an agency,
a department, or an institution covered under this act shall remain in effect.

STATE BUDGET ACT APPLICABILITY
SECTION 9.4. If any provision of this act and G.S. 143C-5-4 are in conflict, the
provisions of this act shall prevail. The appropriations and the authorizations to allocate and
spend funds which are set out in this act shall remain in effect until the Current Operations
Appropriations Act for the applicable fiscal year becomes law, at which time that act shall
become effective and shall govern appropriations and expenditures. When the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for that fiscal year becomes law, the Director of the Budget shall
adjust allotments to give effect to that act from July 1 of the fiscal year.

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 9.5. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
House Bill 389-Third Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9.6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective retroactively to
July 1, 2025.
Page 12 House Bill 389-Third Edition